California statutes. Insurance Code
(n) Publish educational materials, plan descriptions, and comparison sheets describing participating carriers and the benefit plan designs available through the purchasing alliance for use in enrolling employers or small employers and their eligible employees. The information may include an assessment of utilization management procedures and the level of quality and cost-effective care.

(o) Establish conditions for participation of employers or small employers that conform to the requirements of this chapter and that include, but are not limited to, assurances that the employer or small employer is a bona fide employer or small employer group and provision for prepayment of premiums or other mechanisms to ensure that payment will be made for coverage. Conditions for participating small employers shall be uniformly applied to all small employers.

(p) Provide that each eligible employee may choose from any participating medical carrier as long as the participating carrier provides coverage where the employee works or lives.

(q) Receive, review, and act, as appropriate, on grievances by participating employers or enrollees.

(r) Review information and recommendations from consumers, employers, small employers, participating carriers, health care providers, and other sources. After the review, the board may issue reports or otherwise make recommendations to improve the delivery or purchase of health care.

(s) Establish administrative and accounting procedures for operating the purchasing alliance and for providing services to employers, small employers, and enrollees.

(t) Prepare an annual report on the operations of the purchasing alliance to the commissioner, which shall include an accounting of all outside revenues received by the board and internal and independent audits and any other information the commissioner may require.

(u) Establish procedures for billing and collection of premiums from employers and small employers, including any share of the premium paid by enrollees.

(v) Establish procedures for annual open enrollment periods during which an employee enrolled in a health benefit plan through the purchasing alliance may elect to enroll in any health benefit plan that is available to that size group through the purchasing alliance, and that provides health coverage where the employee lives or works and during which any enrollee may elect to enroll in any health benefit plan that is available to that size group through the purchasing alliance, and that provides health coverage where the enrollee lives or works. For purposes of this subdivision, “size group” refers to whether the employer is a small employer or any other employer covered by this chapter.

(w) Provide that in the event an employer or small employer terminates coverage purchased through the purchasing alliance, the former employer or small employer shall be ineligible to purchase a health benefit plan or ancillary benefit plan through the purchasing alliance for a period determined by the alliance, but not to exceed 12 months.

(x) Maintain a trust account or accounts in a California bank for deposit of all moneys received and collected for operation of the purchasing alliance. A purchasing alliance, its owners, operators, partners, board members, employees, and agents shall have a fiduciary duty with respect to all moneys received or owed to it to ensure payment of its obligations and a full accounting to its participating employers, health plans, and the commissioner.

(y) With respect to small employers, ensure that all carrier rates for purchasing alliance small group health benefit plans are consistent with the requirements of Sections 1357.12 and 1357.13 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 10714 and 10715.

(z) Treat all members within an employer or small employer group equally with regard to administrative fees and benefits of participation.

(aa) Every purchasing alliance shall offer at least one health plan that compensates its providers on an other than capitated basis in every region in which the alliance operates.

(ab) Have the authority to develop or contract for the development of uniform standards for data to be provided by participating carriers and providers. The purchasing alliance may collect or contract for the collection of data necessary for evaluation of the performance of participating carriers and their provider networks by consumers, providers, employers, small employers, and the commissioner. In formulating data collection standards, the board may use standards based on, and consistent with, existing state, National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and national health care data collection initiatives, and shall take into account their feasibility and cost-effectiveness.

(ac) Not expend for administrative purposes and profits in any fiscal year an excessive amount of the aggregate premiums, fees, and other periodic payments received by the purchasing alliance for providing health benefits to employers, small employers, and their employees, through a contract with participating carriers. As used in this subdivision, “administrative costs” includes costs in connection with marketing and sales of the health benefit plans offered by the purchasing alliance.

(ad) Exercise all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10841.

(a) A purchasing alliance shall comply with all requirements pertaining to the underwriting, rating and renewal practices for small employers, pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1357.12 of , and subdivision (f) of Section 1357.03 of, the Health and Safety Code, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10714.

(b) A purchasing alliance shall comply with all requirements pertaining to the marketing practices for small employers who participate in the purchasing alliance, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1357.03 of the Health and Safety Code and subdivisions (f) and (j) of Section 10705.

(c) A purchasing alliance shall comply with all requirements pertaining to the participation requirements for small employers who participate in the purchasing alliance, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1357.03 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10706. A carrier participating in a purchasing alliance shall be deemed to be in compliance with this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10842.

A purchasing alliance may do any of the following:

(a) Contract with qualified independent third parties for any services necessary to carry out the powers and duties authorized or required by this chapter.

(b) Employ necessary staff.

(c) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal actions necessary or proper for recovering any penalties for or on behalf of the health insurance purchasing group.

(d) Allow a participating employer to choose the benefit plan design, from those offered by the purchasing alliance, to be made available to their eligible employees.

(e) Allow eligible employees to enroll in any benefit plan design offered by the purchasing alliance.

(f) Contract with licensed insurance agents or brokers to market and service coverage made available through the purchasing alliance to its members. Compensation for agents and brokers may not vary based on the small employer or his or her enrollees and dependents’ actual or expected health status, industry, occupation, medical utilization, claims experience, or geographic location within the service region. This subdivision shall not apply with respect to a compensation arrangement that provides compensation to an agent or broker on the basis of percentage of premium; provided that percentage shall not vary because of the health status, industry, occupation, medical utilization, claims experience, or geographic location within the service region.

(g) Exclude a carrier or freeze enrollment in a carrier for failure to achieve established quality, access, or information reporting standards of the purchasing alliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10843.

A purchasing alliance shall not do any of the following:

(a) Purchase health care services, assume risk for the cost or provision of health services, or otherwise contract with health care providers for the provision of health care services directly to enrollees.

(b) Exclude a small employer or eligible employee or dependent of an eligible employee of a small employer from membership in the purchasing alliance who agrees to pay fees for membership and the premium for coverage through the purchasing alliance and who abides by the bylaws and rules of the purchasing alliance.

(c) Prohibit the participation of small employers, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1357.03 of the Health and Safety Code and in subdivision (b) of Section 10705, or utilize risk adjustment practices that conflict with the small employer group health provisions described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1357.12 of the Health and Safety Code and subdivision (b) of Section 10714.

(d) Charge a fee not directly related to the operation of the purchasing alliance.

(e) As a condition of participation, require an employer or small employer, eligible employee or dependent to subscribe to nonhealth care or nonhealth insurance related products or services.

(f) Operate the purchasing alliance or market the purchasing alliance in a service region in a way that would cause the purchasing alliance to select a risk pool with health care utilization that is significantly below the average for all similar groups with similar coverage in the same region.

(g) Engage in any competitive act or practice that results in the selection of small employers and his or her enrollees and dependents based on actual or expected health status, claims experience, medical utilization, industry, occupation, or geographic location within the service region.

(h) Require or take any action inconsistent or in conflict with state laws or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10844.

A purchasing alliance may offer coverage pursuant to Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 10900).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10845.

(a) The commissioner shall require every purchasing alliance, as a condition precedent to receiving and holding a certificate of registration, to file and maintain in the commissioner’s office a writing designating an agent for service of process. The writing shall state the name of the agent and his or her place of business in this state with sufficient particularity so that he or she can readily be found by peace officers or process servers. Appointment of the agent reasonably available for service of papers, notice, proof of loss, summons or other process during business hours shall be continuously maintained by every registered purchasing alliance subject to this article while it holds a valid and unrevoked certificate of registration.

(b) An agent designated by a purchasing alliance as provided in this article may file with the commissioner a written statement of resignation as that agent, which shall be signed and execution thereof shall be duly acknowledged by the agent. Thereupon, the authority of the agent to act in such capacity shall cease and the commissioner shall forthwith give written notice of the resignation by mail to the purchasing alliance addressed to its principal office as shown by the commissioner’s records. If an agent who has been appointed by a purchasing alliance as provided by this article dies or resigns or removes his or her residence from the state, the purchasing alliance shall forthwith file with the commissioner an appointment of a new agent on a form provided by the commissioner for such purpose and pay the filing fee therefor, and the filing shall be deemed to revoke any prior designation of agent.

(c) No fee shall be charged, except as included in the application for certificate of registration fee provided in this article, for filing the initial appointment under this article by an applicant for registration. Thereafter the commissioner shall require the payment of forty-five dollars ($45) in advance as a fee for filing appointment of agent or stipulation or both by every registered purchasing alliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Participating Carriers [10850. - 10856.]

10850.

(a) In order to be eligible to be a participating carrier, a carrier shall demonstrate the following operating characteristics satisfactory to the board:

(1) Be licensed and approved as a carrier and in good standing with the appropriate regulatory authority.

(2) The ability to provide data required by the board, including information on enrollee satisfaction based on standard surveys, as may be prescribed, and to meet reasonable satisfaction measures as may be established.

(3) The ability to provide standard data elements in a manner prescribed by the board.

(4) All other criteria established by the board.

(b) Carriers that contract with or employ health care providers shall have mechanisms to accomplish all of the following in a manner satisfactory to the purchasing alliance, provided that the requirements of the alliance do not conflict with the carrier’s licensing requirements:

(1) Review the quality of care covered.

(2) Review the appropriateness of care covered.

(3) Provide accessible health care services.

(c) In evaluating which carriers may participate in the purchasing alliance, the board shall consider all of the following:

(1) Minimum geographic service and participation requirements, maximum thresholds for premium rates, and standards for determining whether a carrier operates efficiently.

(2) The ability of a carrier to provide services within the purchasing alliance service regions.

(3) Pricing and the competitiveness of each bid from a carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.

Every participating carrier shall:

(a) Meet the standards established by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Provide any data required by the board.

(c) Comply with, all applicable laws and regulations that regulate health care coverage or medical benefits provided to employers, including, with respect to coverage that is provided to small employers, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10700) for insurers and Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 1357) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for health care service plans. However, a carrier contracting to participate in a purchasing alliance shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements for small employers of subdivision (a) of Section 1357.03 of the Health and Safety Code and of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 10705 for a benefit plan design offered through the purchasing alliance in those service regions in which the carrier participates in the purchasing alliance and the benefit plan design is offered exclusively through the purchasing alliance.

(d) Comply with all rules and regulations regarding the application of risk adjustment factors to standard risk rates for small employers as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1357.12 of the Health and Safety Code and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10714 of this code. A participating carrier shall also comply with the requirements that coverage be issued to small employers on a guaranteed issue basis as is specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1357.03 of the Health and Safety Code and subdivision (b) of Section 10705 of this code for small employers.

(e) All participating medical carriers shall, in determining small employer rates for health benefit plans offered through a purchasing alliance, use the six service regions established by this chapter in determining risk categories for standard employee risk rates.

(f) Enroll and disenroll individuals as directed by the purchasing alliance or its designee.

(g) Comply with any other requirement established by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10853.

In contracts with participating carriers, the purchasing alliance may establish performance standards for specific contractual elements and penalties for failure to fulfill specific contractual obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10854.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a participating carrier from contracting with particular health care providers or types, classes, or categories of health care providers or setting reimbursement methodology.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10855.

In the event the participating carrier elects to terminate its participating agreement with a purchasing alliance, the participating carrier shall do both of the following:

(a) Provide advance notice of its decision to the board.

(b) Provide notice of the decision at least 180 days prior to the nonrenewal of any health benefit plan or ancillary benefit plan to employers or small employers and enrollees.

A participating carrier that elects not to renew a health benefit plan with a purchasing alliance shall be prohibited from writing new business through the purchasing alliance for a period of three years from the date of the notice to the purchasing alliance or until the purchasing alliance, with the concurrence of the commissioner, invites the former participating carrier to renew participation, whichever is sooner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10856.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the existing regulatory authority of the Department of Managed Health Care to regulate health care service plans or of the Department of Insurance to regulate disability or life insurers or hospital service plans. None of the requirements of this article shall conflict with the participating carrier’s licensing requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contracts with Employers, Small Employers, and Participating Carriers [10860. - 10861.]

10860.

Contracts between the purchasing alliance and participating carriers shall specify how all premiums will be transmitted, and penalties and grace periods for payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10861.

Contracts between purchasing alliances and participating employers shall provide all of the following:

(a) For administrative purposes, the purchasing alliance shall be the policyholder or contractholder of the health benefit plan or ancillary benefit plan on behalf of participating employers, their eligible employees, and dependents.

(b) That the participating carrier will issue a certificate of coverage, or equivalent document, specifying the essential features of the health benefit plan’s or ancillary benefit plan’s coverage to each enrolled eligible employee.

(c) The following notice shall be provided to employers, small employers, and eligible employees who obtain coverage from a purchasing alliance at the time of enrollment:

NOTICE

(1) THE PURCHASING ALLIANCE IS NOT AN INSURANCE COMPANY AND DOES NOT PAY BENEFITS OR CLAIMS. IT COLLECTS AND DISTRIBUTES PREMIUMS IN YOUR EMPLOYER’S BEHALF TO INSURERS WHO MAY PARTICIPATE IN A GUARANTEE FUND CREATED BY CALIFORNIA LAW. THE ALLIANCE ITSELF DOES NOT PARTICIPATE IN A GUARANTEE FUND CREATED BY CALIFORNIA LAW.

(2) THE PURCHASING ALLIANCE WHICH YOUR EMPLOYER HAS JOINED IS REGISTERED BY THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE TO PROVIDE SPECIFIC ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES AND MAY NOT ASSUME ANY RISK FOR CLAIM AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS.

(3) FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE PURCHASING ALLIANCE YOU SHOULD ASK QUESTIONS OF YOUR BENEFITS ADMINISTRATOR OR YOU MAY CONTACT THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AT 1-800-927-4356.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Marketing [10870. - 10873.]

10870.

The board shall establish marketing standards to be used by participating carriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10871.

Any marketing, advertisement, or educational material for health benefit plans or ancillary benefit plans sold through the purchasing alliance shall be approved by the board prior to its use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10872.

This article shall not be construed to prohibit or to compel the purchasing alliance or a participating carrier from using the services of an agent or broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10873.

(a) A participating carrier, agent, broker, contractor, or producer of a participating carrier, or independent insurance agent, broker, contractor, or producer may not engage, directly or indirectly, in an activity or marketing practice that would encourage small employers or eligible enrollees to do any of the following:

(1) Refrain from enrolling in a health benefit plan offered through the purchasing alliance because of their health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location within the service region.

(2) Seek coverage from other participating carriers because of their health status, claim experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location within the service region.

(3) Enroll or fail to enroll in the purchasing alliance because of their health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location within the service region.

(b) In the event that an agent, broker, contractor, carrier, or producer of a participating carrier fails to abide by these provisions, they shall be subject to the penalties and fines described in Section 10718.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Solvency [10880. - 10880.]

10880.

In the event a purchasing alliance becomes insolvent, the commissioner shall maintain jurisdiction of the alliance for purposes of protection of the interests of the alliance enrollees. In that event, the commissioner may do any of the following:

(a) Arrange for transfer of coverage from the insolvent purchasing alliance to one that is deemed to be solvent by the commissioner.

(b) Arrange for individual employers or small employers participating in the purchasing alliance to obtain coverage through one or more participating carriers outside of an alliance arrangement.

(c) Take any other actions necessary to preserve the coverage provided to employers, small employers, and enrollees in the insolvent alliance.

(d) In any proceedings under this article, the costs of employing special deputy commissioners, clerks, or assistants appointed to carry out this article, and all expenses of taking possession of, conversing, conducting, liquidating, disposing of, or otherwise dealing with the business and property of the alliance under this article, shall be fixed by the commissioner, subject to the approval of the court, and shall be paid out of the assets of the alliance to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Exemptions [10885. - 10887.]

10885.

Purchasing alliances shall be exempt from requirements of licensure as a health care service plan or solicitor under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10886.

For purposes of carrier product disclosure, a purchasing alliance shall be considered an entity that provides administrative services, as is described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 10705. As such, a purchasing alliance shall not be required to provide a summary of those plans offered by participating carriers outside of the purchasing alliance with whom they have contracted. A purchasing alliance shall be required to provide a summary brochure of all benefit plan designs that the purchasing alliance offers to employers or small employers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10887.

Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 10820, nothing in this chapter shall apply to a health care service plan licensed under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of the Health and Safety Code) when operating within the scope of that license and not contracting with a purchasing alliance registered under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Individual Access to Contracts for Health Care Services [10900. - 10902.5.]

10900.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Benefit plan design” means a specific health coverage policy issued by a carrier to individuals, to trustees of associations that cover individuals. It includes services covered and the levels of copayment and deductibles, and it may include the professional providers who are to provide those services and the sites where those services are to be provided. A benefit plan design may also be an integrated system for the financing and delivery of quality health services that has significant incentives for the covered individuals to use the system.

(b) “Carrier” means any disability insurance company or any other entity that writes, issues, or administers health benefit plans, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, that cover individuals, regardless of the situs of the contract or master policyholder.

(c) “Creditable coverage” means:

(1) Any individual or group policy, contract, or program that is written or administered by a disability insurer, health care service plan, fraternal benefits society, self-insured employer plan, or any other entity, in this state or elsewhere, and that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other plans. The term includes continuation or conversion coverage but does not include accident only, credit, disability income, Champus supplement, Medicare supplement, long-term care, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(2) The federal Medicare program pursuant to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.

(3) The medicaid program pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

(4) Any other publicly sponsored program, provided in this state or elsewhere, of medical, hospital, and surgical care.

(5) 10 U.S.C.A. Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 1071) (CHAMPUS).

(6) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization.

(7) A state health benefits risk pool.

(8) A health plan offered under 5 U.S.C.A. Chapter 89 (commencing with Section 8901) (FEHBP).

(9) A public health plan as defined in federal regulations authorized by Section 2701(c)(1)(l) of the Public Health Service Act, as amended by Public Law 104-191.

(10) A health benefit plan under Section 5(e) of the Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C.A. 2504(e)).

(d) “Dependent” means the spouse or child of an eligible individual or other individual applying for coverage, subject to applicable terms of the health benefit plan covering the eligible person.

(e) “Federally eligible defined individual” means an individual who as of the date on which the individual seeks coverage under this part, (1) has 18 or more months of creditable coverage, and whose most recent prior creditable coverage was under a group health plan, a federal governmental plan maintained for federal employees, or a governmental plan or church plan as defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002), (2) is not eligible for coverage under an employer-sponsored health benefit plan, Medicare, or Medi-Cal, and has no other health insurance coverage, (3) was not terminated from his or her most recent creditable coverage due to nonpayment of premiums or fraud, and (4) if offered continuation coverage under COBRA or Cal-COBRA, had elected and exhausted such coverage.

(f) “In force business” means an existing health benefit plan issued by a carrier to a federally eligible defined individual.

(g) “New business” means a health benefit plan issued to an eligible individual that is not the carrier’s in force business.

(h) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges and expenses incurred during a specified period following the eligible individual’s effective date, as to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.

Every carrier offering health benefit plans to individuals shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.1.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude the application of this chapter to either of the following: (a) an association, trust, or other organization acting as a health care service plan as defined under Section 1345, (b) an association, trust, multiple employer welfare arrangement, or other organization or person presenting information regarding a health benefit plan to persons who may be interested in subscribing or enrolling in the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.2.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2001, a carrier shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell the health benefit plan designs described in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that are sold to individuals or to associations that include individuals to all federally eligible defined individuals in each geographic region in which the carrier provides coverage for health care services. Each carrier shall make available to each federally eligible defined individual the identified health benefit plan designs which the plan offers and sells to individuals or to associations that include individuals.

(b) A carrier may not reject an application from a federally eligible defined individual for a benefit plan design under the following circumstances:

(1) The federally eligible defined individual as defined by subdivision (e) of Section 10900 agrees to make the required premium payments.

(2) The federally eligible defined individual, and his or her dependents who are to be covered by the carrier, work or reside in the service area in which the plan provides or otherwise arranges for the provision of health care services.

(c) No carrier or agent or broker shall, directly or indirectly, encourage or direct federally eligible defined individuals to refrain from filing an application for coverage with a carrier because of health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, receipt of health care, genetic information, evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence, disability, or geographic location provided that it is within the carrier’s approved service area.

(d) No carrier shall, directly or indirectly, enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement with an agent or broker that provides for or results in the compensation paid to a solicitor for the sale of a health benefit plan design to be varied because of health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, receipt of health care, genetic information, evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence, disability, or geographic location of the individual. This subdivision shall not apply with respect to a compensation arrangement that provides compensation to an agent or broker on the basis of percentage of premium, provided that the percentage shall not vary for the reasons listed in this subdivision.

(e) If a carrier enters into a contract, agreement, or other arrangement with a third-party administrator or other entity to provide administrative, marketing, or other services related to the offering of health benefit plans to individuals in this state, the third-party administrator shall be subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 810, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.3.

(a) (1) After the federally eligible defined individual submits a completed application form for a health benefit plan, the carrier shall, within 30 days, notify the individual of the individual’s actual premium charges for that health benefit plan design. In no case shall the premium charged for any health benefit plan identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 exceed the following amounts:

(A) For health benefit plans that offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, the average premium paid by a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible
 defined individual. However, for a federally eligible defined individual who is between the ages of 60 and 64 years, inclusive, the premium shall not exceed the average premium paid by a subscriber of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program who is 59 years of age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(B) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that do not offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, 170 percent of the standard premium charged to an individual who is of the same age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual. However, for a federally eligible defined individual who is between the ages of 60 and 64 years, inclusive, the premium shall not exceed 170 percent of the standard premium charged to an individual who is 59 years of age and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible
 defined individual. The individual shall have 30 days in which to exercise the right to buy coverage at the quoted premium rates.

(2) A carrier may adjust the premium based on family size, not to exceed the following amounts:

(A) For health benefit plans that offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, the average of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program rate for families of the same size that reside in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(B) For health benefit plans identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 that do not offer services through a preferred provider arrangement, 170 percent of the standard premium charged to a family that is of the same size and resides in the same geographic area as the federally eligible defined individual.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2014. This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(b) (1) On and after January 1, 2014, after the federally eligible defined individual submits a completed application form for a health benefit plan, the carrier shall, within 30 days, notify the individual of the individual’s actual premium charges for that health benefit plan design. In no case shall the premium charged for any health benefit plan identified in subdivision (d) of Section 10785 exceed the following amounts:

(A) With respect to the rate charged for coverage provided in 2014, the rate charged in 2013 for that coverage multiplied by 1.09.

(B) With respect to the rate charged for coverage provided
 in 2015 and each subsequent year, the rate charged in the prior year multiplied by a factor of one plus the percentage change in the statewide average premium for the second lowest cost silver plan offered on the Exchange. The Exchange shall determine the percentage change in the statewide average premium for the second lowest cost silver plan by subtracting clause (i) from clause (ii) and dividing the result by clause (i).

(i) The average of the premiums charged in the year prior to the applicable year for the second lowest cost silver plan in all 19 rating regions, with the premium for each region weighted based on the region’s relative share of the Exchange’s total individual enrollment according to the latest data available to the Exchange.

(ii) The average of the premiums to be charged in the applicable year for the second lowest cost silver plan in all 19 rating regions,
 with the premium for each region weighted based on the region’s relative share of the Exchange’s total individual enrollment according to the latest data available to the Exchange.

(C) The Exchange shall determine the percentage change in the statewide average premium no later than 30 days after the Exchange’s rates for individual coverage for the applicable year have been finalized.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(3) This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2014, and shall become inoperative on January 1, 2020.

(c) When a federally eligible defined individual submits a premium payment, based on the quoted premium
 charges, and that payment is delivered or postmarked, whichever occurs earlier, within the first 15 days of the month, coverage shall begin no later than the first day of the following month. When that payment is neither delivered nor postmarked until after the 15th day of a month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the second month following delivery or postmark of the payment.
